District of Columbia statutes.
15-302

Period during which writ of execution may issue; returnable period.

(a)

A writ of execution on a judgment in a civil action may be issued within three years after:

(1)

the expiration of any stay of execution agreed to by the parties; or

(2)

it first might have been issued under applicable provisions of law or rules of court.

(b)

A writ of execution shall be returnable on or before the sixtieth day after its date.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 525, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1973 Ed., § 15-302.
1981 Ed., § 15-302.
This section is referenced in § 15-301 and § 15-303.
Wrongful death damages, exemption from appropriation for payment of debts and liabilities, see § 16-2703.
Unemployment compensation benefits, exemption from execution, except for debts accrued for necessaries, see § 51-118.
Teacher retirement annuities, exemption from assignment or execution, see § 38-2001.17.
Seizure by execution of goods located on leased premises, payment of rent due as prerequisite, see § 42-3216.
Public assistance, exemption from assignment and execution, see § 4-217.01.
Landlord’s lien for rent, enforcement by execution, see §§ 42-3214 and 42-3215.
Group life policies and proceeds, exemption from execution, see § 31-4717.
Fraternal benefit association benefits, exemption from execution, see § 31-5711.
forfeited recognizances and judgments, executions upon, see § 16-709.
Exemptions from executions generally, see § 15-101 et seq.
Disability insurance benefits, exemption from execution, see § 31-4716.01.